Mississippi statutes. Title 7. Executive Department
Article 1. General.

§ 7-17-1.
Short title.

Chapter 544, Laws of 1989, shall be cited as the “Mississippi Executive Reorganization Act of 1989.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 544, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 19, 1989).

§ 7-17-3.
Legislative intent.

It is the intent of “the Mississippi Executive Reorganization Act of 1989 [Chapter 544, Laws of 1989]” to provide that the Governor and the executive branch of the government of the State of Mississippi shall have full authority to execute the laws of Mississippi and to administer and manage the affairs of state government in accordance with the Mississippi Constitution of 1890.

Provided, however, nothing in “the Mississippi Executive Reorganization Act of 1989” is intended to reduce in any manner the authority of the Legislature to appropriate funds or to specify the means by which such funds are to be expended.

No executive director, division director or any other employee of any agency or department of this state shall be prohibited by the Governor or any other person, whether by written or verbal correspondence or by executive order, from cooperating with the Legislature for purposes of providing information to the Legislature, or any member thereof, regarding the legislative budget process or any other legislative matter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 544, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 19, 1989).

§ 7-17-5.
Transfer of employees, property, staff and funds; general powers and duties of executive directors of departments of executive branch.

Effective July 1, 1989, all employees of any agency abolished or affected by the Mississippi Executive Reorganization Act of 1989 [Chapter 544, Laws of 1989] shall be transferred according to the merger of their duties by the Mississippi Executive Reorganization Act of 1989. All personnel actions initiated as a result of the Mississippi Executive Reorganization Act of 1989 shall be subject to State Personnel Board procedures.

The executive director of any agency of state government as defined in Section 25-9-107(d) shall have the authority to employ staff and to expend funds authorized to the agency for the performance of the duties and responsibilities accorded to the agency by the laws of the State of Mississippi.

All records, personnel, property and unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations or other funds of any agency or department abolished or affected by the Mississippi Executive Reorganization Act of 1989 shall be transferred to the appropriate agency according to the merger of their functions under the Mississippi Executive Reorganization Act of 1989.

The executive directors of agencies shall determine which employees shall be bonded, set the amount of bond, which shall be made by a surety company approved by the Secretary of State and the premiums paid as other expenses of administering the Mississippi Executive Reorganization Act of 1989.

The executive director of any agency, where permitted by the rules, regulations and policies of the board, commission or authority of the agency, if any, shall also have authority to:

Accept on behalf of the state gifts, trusts, bequests, grants, endowments, or transfers of property of any kind to be used for the sole benefit of the state;

Use and expend funds coming to the agency from state, federal and private sources;

Establish such rules and regulations as may be necessary in carrying out the provisions of the Mississippi Executive Reorganization Act of 1989;

Formulate and administer policies of their respective agencies;

Coordinate, supervise and direct all administrative and technical activities of the agency;

Enter into contracts, grants and cooperative agreements with any federal or state agency, department or subdivision thereof, or any public or private institution located inside or outside the State of Mississippi, or any person, corporation or association in connection with the carrying out of the provisions of the Mississippi Executive Reorganization Act of 1989, provided the agreements do not have a financial cost in excess of the amounts appropriated for such purposes by the Legislature;

Except where otherwise prescribed by law, prepare and deliver to the Legislature and the Governor on or before January 1 of each year, and at such other times as may be required by the Legislature or Governor, a full report of the work of the agency and the offices thereof, including a detailed statement of expenditures of the agency and any recommendations;

Make provisions for adoption of rules, regulations and policy and provide for public inspection and filing of same; and other requirements set forth in the Mississippi Administrative Procedures Law in Section 25-43-1.101 et seq., except as otherwise provided by law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 544, § 3; Laws, 1990, ch. 522, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 7-17-7.
Vacation of position of member of board, commission, council or authority upon change of residence; exception.

Any member of any board, commission, council or authority reconstituted under “the Mississippi Executive Reorganization Act of 1989 [Chapter 544, Laws of 1989]” shall be deemed to have vacated his position thereon if he changes his residence to another state or to a geographical area other than the one from which he was appointed if the statute specified that he shall be appointed from such designated geographical area. Provided, however, that this section shall not apply in the event the member was appointed from a district the boundaries of which have been altered by statute or court order.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 544, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved April 19, 1989).

§ 7-17-9.
Governor to appoint departmental advisory boards.

The Governor shall have the authority to appoint departmental advisory boards where otherwise required by law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 544, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved April 19, 1989).

§ 7-17-11.
Organizational structure and nomenclature for budgetary purposes.

For budgetary purposes and organizational hierarchy purposes a common organizational nomenclature shall be used in the structure of state government.

Organizations for such purposes shall be:

Agency – the principal administrative organization of state government as defined in Section 25-9-107(d), headed by an executive director or such other official as prescribed by statute;

Office – the principal organization of an agency; whenever the term “division” or any other term appears to denote the principal organization of a department, it shall mean “office” for purposes of this section;

Bureau – the principal organization of an office;

Division – the principal organization of a bureau;

Branch – the principal organization of a division;

Section – the principal organization of a branch;

Unit – the principal organization of a section;

Advisory board – a body appointed to function on a continuing basis to study and recommend solutions and policy alternatives to problems arising in a specific agency or program of state government.

The nomenclature outlined in this section shall be only for budgetary purposes and organizational hierarchy purposes and shall not define job classifications or salary ranges. The State Personnel Board shall ensure that all agencies within state government as defined in Section 25-9-107(d) conform with the common organization nomenclature provided in this section, except where otherwise provided by law or determined to be necessary by the State Personnel Board.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 544, § 6; Laws, 1990, ch. 522, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1990.